Massachusetts, session 194th, S2202.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the first
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
Section 5. The commissioner shall, in a manner and to the extent provided by this
chapter, control and supervise any building project to be undertaken by a state agency or building
authority when the estimated cost of the project exceeds $1,000,000 and involves structural or
mechanical work. The commissioner may, upon request of a state agency or building authority,
delegate project control and supervision to that state agency or building authority over projects
involving structural or mechanical work whose estimated cost is less than $10,000,000 if the
commissioner determines that the agency or authority has the ability to control and supervise
such project. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any state agency or building authority
of 2

shall control and supervise its own building projects when the estimated cost of such project is
less than $1,000,000, or if the project does not involve structural or mechanical work. As used in
this section, ''estimated cost'' shall mean the estimated construction cost stated in a study or
program prepared in accordance with section 59.
of 2